Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 3.1
STUDENT LOAN PROGRAM

Cross references:

For exclusion from the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code" of loans made or guaranteed by an agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state pursuant to this article, see § 5-1-202 (1)(f); for the "Higher Education Act of 1965", see 20 U.S.C. 1001 et seq.

Section

PART 1 ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM

PART 2 STUDENT OBLIGATIONS AND INSTITUTIONAL LOANS

PART 3 SAVINGS PLANS